Utah statutes.
26-42-106.   Recognition of licensee's training program.
(1)  In determining the amount of the monetary penalty to be imposed for an
employee's violation of Section 26-42-103, the hearing officer shall reduce
the penalty by at least 50% if he determines:
(a)  the licensee has implemented a documented employee training program; and
(b)  the employee has completed that training program within 30 days of
commencing duties of selling tobacco products.
(2) (a)  If the hearing officer determines under Subsection (1), regarding a
first offense at a location, that the licensee has not implemented a
documented training program with a written curriculum for employees at that
location regarding compliance with this chapter, the hearing officer may
suspend all or a portion of the monetary penalty, contingent upon the
licensee's initiating a training program for employees at that location within
30 days after the hearing date.
(b)  If the hearing officer determines at a subsequent hearing that the
licensee has not implemented the training program within the time period
required under Subsection (2)(a), the suspended monetary penalty shall be
promptly imposed, unless the licensee demonstrates good cause for granting an
extension of time for implementation of the training program.
